Hawaii, session 2025, SB610.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that there has been improvement in reducing the State's shortage of kindergarten through grade twelve teachers.  The department of education reported one hundred sixty-six unfilled positions in the 2024‑2025 academic year, a staggering decrease from the more than one thousand unfilled positions reported during the 2022‑2023 academic year. Despite this, education officials remain concerned about future teacher shortages. Specifically, the legislature finds that the State does not have a sustainable way to grow and retain its teacher pool.  Moreover, another wave of teacher retirements is expected in the coming year. While other states facing teacher shortages have used the sale of lottery tickets to help provide a sustainable, supplemental funding source for education, the legislature finds that, for Hawaii, an appropriate solution is the establishment of a rounding-up program, in which residents may designate additional educational funding amounts on their utility bills. Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to establish a rounding up for teachers program, in which residents may round up the amount due on an electrical or water bill and designate those additional amounts to be used to provide additional compensation for teachers. SECTION 2. Chapter 54, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to part II to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§54-     Rounding up for teachers program.  (a) Each board shall provide an option on each customer's utility bill for the customer to voluntarily: (1)  Round up the total amount of the customer's water utility bill to the nearest dollar amount; or (2)  Contribute a specific donation amount of the customer's choice, with the proceeds to be deposited into the rounding up for teachers' salaries special fund established pursuant to section 302A-    . (b)  Each option described in subsection (a)(1) and (2) shall appear as a line item on the utility bill.  The board shall clearly indicate that: (1)  Any moneys contributed will be deposited into the rounding up for teachers' salaries special fund for the purpose of providing additional compensation for department of education teachers; and (2)  Participation in the program is voluntary." SECTION 3.  Chapter 269, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to part III to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§269- Electric utilities; rounding up for teachers program.  (a) Each electric utility shall provide an option on each customer's utility bill for the customer to voluntarily: (1)  Round up the total amount of the customer's electric utility bill to the nearest dollar amount; or (2)  Contribute a specific donation amount of the customer's choice, with the proceeds to be deposited into the rounding up for teachers' salaries special fund established pursuant to section 302A-    . (b)  Each option described in subsection (a)(1) and (2) shall appear as a line item on the utility bill.  The electric utility shall clearly indicate that: (1)  Any moneys contributed will be deposited into the rounding up for teachers' salaries special fund for the purpose of providing additional compensation for department of education teachers; and (2)  Participation in the program is voluntary. (c)  Any moneys collected pursuant to this section shall not be considered revenue of the electric utilities and, accordingly, shall not be subject to state or county taxes, including the general excise tax under chapter 237, the public service company tax under chapter 239, the public utility fee under section 269-30, and the public utility franchise tax under chapter 240." SECTION 4.  Chapter 302A, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to part III, subpart B, to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§302A- Rounding up for teachers' salaries special fund.  (a) There is established within the state treasury the rounding up for teachers' salaries special fund, into which shall be deposited: (1)  All moneys received pursuant to sections 54-    and 269-   ; and (2)  Any other appropriations, grants, or donations received by the department and designated for deposit into the fund. (b)  Subject to appropriation by the legislature, the department may use moneys in the fund to provide additional compensation for teachers, including through increases in salaries or bonuses. (c)  The board shall adopt rules pursuant to chapter 91 to establish policies and procedures for the expenditure of moneys from the fund. (d)  Any moneys deposited into the fund shall be in addition to and shall not supplant any portion of the base budget of the department of education." SECTION 5. There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $           or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 to assist the counties in implementing section 2 of this Act; provided that the moneys shall be expended as follows: (1)  County of Hawaii             $ (2)  County of Kauai              $ (3)  County of Maui               $ (4)  City and county of Honolulu   $ The sums appropriated shall be expended by the respective county for the purposes of this Act and shall constitute the State's share of the cost of the mandated program under article VIII, section 5, of the state constitution. SECTION 6. New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 7. This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2025; provided that sections 2 and 3 shall take effect on July 1, 2026. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________